Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-523
Wild mammal
or wild bird; hunt or trap; unlawful in certain areas; violation; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful to hunt with
a rifle within a two-hundred-yard radius of an inhabited dwelling or livestock
feedlot, to hunt without a rifle or trap any form of wild mammal
or wild bird within a one-hundred-yard radius of
an inhabited dwelling or livestock feedlot, or to trap within a two-hundred-yard
radius of any passage used by livestock to pass under any highway, road, or
bridge.

(2) This section shall not prohibit any owner, tenant, or operator or
his or her guests from hunting or trapping any form of wild mammal or wild
bird within such radius if the area is under his or her ownership or control.
This section shall not prohibit duly authorized personnel of any county, city,
or village health or animal control department from trapping with a humane
live box trap or pursuing any form of wild mammal or wild bird, when conducting
such activities within the scope of the authorization, within such radius
if the area is under the jurisdiction of the county, city, or village.

(3) Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III
misdemeanor and shall be fined at least one hundred dollars upon conviction.

Laws 1967, c. 214, § 1, p. 575;

Laws 1974, LB 779, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 24, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-526;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 243;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 32;

Laws 2010, LB836, § 3.